en: Tie Down Straps
xx: Tie Down Straps
cs: Upínací popruhy
da: Stropper
de: Spanngurte
es: Correas de amarre
fr: Sangles
it: Cinghie di fissaggio carichi
ja: 固定用ストラップ
nl: Vastsnoerbanden
no: Spennbånd
pl: Pasy mocujące
pt: Amarras
ru: Фиксирующие ремни
sv: Spännband
tr: Sabitleme Kayışları

en: Twine
xx: Twine
cs: Motouzy
da: Sejlgarn
de: Bindegarne
es: Cordel
fr: Ficelles
it: Spago
ja: 麻糸
nl: Garen
no: Hyssing
pl: Dratwy
pt: Barbante
ru: Бечёвка
sv: Snören
tr: Sicim

en: Utility Wire
xx: Utility Wire
cs: Univerzální drát
da: Stålwire
de: Draht
es: Alambre
fr: Câbles, Câble
it: Fil di ferro
ja: ワイヤー
nl: Elektriciteitskabels
no: Metalltråd
pl: Druty
pt: Fios
ru: Хозяйственная проволока
sv: Ståltråd
tr: Çok Amaçlı Teller

en: Coils
xx: Coils
cs: Cívky
da: Spoler
de: Spulen
es: Espirales
fr: Bobines
it: Bobine
ja: コイル
nl: Spoelen
no: Ruller
pl: Cewki
pt: Bobinas
ru: Катушки
sv: Rullar
tr: Bobinler

en: Concrete Molds
xx: Concrete Molds
cs: Betonové formy
da: Betonforme
de: Betonformen
es: Moldes para hormigón
fr: Moules à béton
it: Blocchi di cemento
ja: コンクリート型枠
nl: Betonmallen
no: Støpeformer
pl: Odlewy z betonu
pt: Moldes de concreto
ru: Формы для бетона
sv: Betonggjutform
tr: Beton Kalıplar

en: Dowel Pins & Rods
xx: Dowel Pins & Rods
cs: Čepy a kolíky
da: Dyvler
de: Zylinderstifte & Dübelstangen
es: Espigas y varillas
fr: Goujons et chevilles
it: Perni e cilindri
ja: 差し込みダボ・ロッド
nl: Deuvels en pennen
no: Treplugger og styrepinner
pl: Kołki i sworznie
pt: Passadores de pinos e hastes
ru: Установочные шипы и штыри
sv: Styrpinnar och -stänger
tr: Kavilyalar ve Çubuklar

en: Drawer Slides
xx: Drawer Slides
cs: Zásuvkové výsuvy
da: Skuffeudtræk
de: Schubladenschienen
es: Rieles para cajones
fr: Coulisses pour tiroirs
it: Guide per cassetti
ja: 引き出し用スライドレール
nl: Ladegeleiders
no: Ekspansjonsbeslag til skuffer
pl: Prowadnice do szuflad
pt: Corrediças para gavetas
ru: Направляющие для выдвижных ящиков
sv: Lådskenor
tr: Çekmece Sürgüleri

en: Drop Cloths
xx: Drop Cloths
cs: Krycí tkaniny
da: Afdækning
de: Abdeckfolien
es: Tela protectora
fr: Toiles de protection
it: Teli protettivi
ja: 養生シート
nl: Afdekfolie
no: Dryppfiller
pl: Materiały ochronne
pt: Panos de proteção para reparos
ru: Пылезащитные чехлы
sv: Skyddstyg
tr: Mobilya Örtüleri

en: Filters & Screens
xx: Filters & Screens
cs: Filtry a síťky
da: Filtre og skærme
de: Filter & Siebe
es: Filtros y pantallas
fr: Filtres et tamis
it: Filtri e schermature
ja: フィルター・スクリーン
nl: Filters en schermen
no: Filtre og skjermer
pl: Filtry i ekrany
pt: Filtros e peneiras
ru: Фильтры и экраны
sv: Filter och skärmar
tr: Filtreler ve Perdeler

en: Flagging & Caution Tape
xx: Flagging & Caution Tape
cs: Výstražné a vytyčovací pásky
da: Afmærknings- og advarselstape
de: Warnklebeband
es: Cinta indicadora y de advertencia
fr: Ruban de signalisation
it: Nastri segnaletici
ja: マーキングテープ・標識テープ
nl: Markerings- en waarschuwingstape
no: Markerings- og varselteip
pl: Taśmy ostrzegawcze i sygnalizacyjne
pt: Faixas sinalizadoras e faixas de isolamento
ru: Маркировочная и предупредительная лента
sv: Markerings- och varningstejp
tr: İşaretleme ve İkaz Bandı

en: Gas Hoses
xx: Gas Hoses
cs: Plynové hadice
da: Gasslanger
de: Gasschläuche
es: Mangueras de gas
fr: Tuyaux de gaz
it: Tubi per gas
ja: ガスホース
nl: Gasslangen
no: Gasslanger
pl: Węże do gazu
pt: Mangueiras de gás
ru: Шланги для подводки газа
sv: Gasslangar
tr: Gaz Hortumları

en: Ground Spikes
xx: Ground Spikes
cs: Kotvicí hroty
da: Jordspyd
de: Bodenspieße
es: Puntas para anclaje en el suelo
fr: Piquets de sol
it: Picchetti
ja: 埋め込み用支柱固定金具
nl: Grondankers
no: Jordspyd
pl: Śledzie i kotwy
pt: Estacas de solo
ru: Земляные колышки
sv: Markskruvar
tr: Kazıklar

en: Hardware Fasteners
xx: Hardware Fasteners
cs: Spojovací prvky
da: Fastgøringselementer
de: Befestigungselemente
es: Artículos de ferretería
fr: Fixations pour matériel
it: Avvitatori da ferramenta
ja: 締結部品
nl: Bevestigingsmaterialen
no: Festeelementer
pl: Akcesoria mocujące do sprzętu
pt: Parafusos de hardware
ru: Крепежные изделия
sv: Fästen
tr: Teçhizat Bağlama Elemanları

en: Drywall Anchors
xx: Drywall Anchors
cs: Kotvy do sádrokartonu
da: Gipsekspandere
de: Dübel
es: Tacos tirafondos
fr: Ancrages pour cloisons sèches
it: Tasselli per cartongesso
ja: ドライウォール用アンカー
nl: Gipsplaatpluggen
no: Tørrmur-ankere
pl: Kołki rozporowe
pt: Buchas para placa de reboco
ru: Дюбели для гипсокартона
sv: Expanderpluggar
tr: Alçıpan Dübelleri

en: Nails
xx: Nails
cs: Hřebíky
da: Søm
de: Nägel
es: Clavos
fr: Clous
it: Chiodi
ja: 釘
nl: Spijkers
no: Spiker
pl: Gwoździe
pt: Pregos
ru: Гвозди
sv: Spikar
tr: Çiviler

en: Nuts & Bolts
xx: Nuts & Bolts
cs: Šrouby a matice
da: Møtrikker og bolte
de: Schrauben & Muttern
es: Tuercas y pernos
fr: Écrous et boulons
it: Dadi e bulloni
ja: ナット・ボルト
nl: Bouten en moeren
no: Skruer og muttere
pl: Nakrętki i śruby
pt: Porcas e parafusos
ru: Гайки и болты
sv: Skruvar och muttrar
tr: Somunlar ve Cıvatalar

en: Rivets
xx: Rivets
cs: Nýty
da: Nitter
de: Nieten
es: Remaches
fr: Rivets
it: Rivetti
ja: リベット
nl: Klinknagels
no: Nagler
pl: Nity
pt: Rebites
ru: Заклепки
sv: Nitar
tr: Perçinler

en: Screw Posts
xx: Screw Posts
cs: Spojovací šrouby
da: Skruenitter
de: Schraubverbinder
es: Bornes de tornillo
fr: Vis radiculaires
it: Viti tubolari
ja: 組ネジ
nl: Busschroeven
no: Skruestenger
pl: Ośki dwuczęściowe
pt: Parafusos para encadernação
ru: Винты-стяжки
sv: Gängade hylsor
tr: Perçinli Vidalar

en: Screws
xx: Screws
cs: Šrouby
da: Skruer
de: Schrauben
es: Tornillos
fr: Vis
it: Viti
ja: ネジ
nl: Schroeven
no: Skruer
pl: Śruby
pt: Parafusos
ru: Винты
sv: Skruvar
tr: Vidalar

en: Threaded Rods
xx: Threaded Rods
cs: Závitové tyče
da: Gevindstænger
de: Gewindestangen
es: Varillas roscadas
fr: Tiges filetées
it: Barre filettate
ja: ネジ部品
nl: Draadstangen
no: Gjengestenger
pl: Pręty gwintowane
pt: Hastes rosqueada
ru: Резьбовые шпильки
sv: Gängade stänger
tr: Vidalı Rodlar